District of Columbia statutes.
28-4102

Overcharging.

(a)

It shall be unlawful for any person to charge more than the normal average retail price for any merchandise or service sold during an emergency that resulted from a natural disaster, if an emergency has been declared pursuant to subsection (b) of this section.

(b)

(1)

Within 48 hours of a natural disaster, the Mayor may declare, for not more than 30 calendar days, a state of emergency for the purposes of this act. The Mayor shall prepare an emergency declaration that shall include a description of the existence, nature, extent, and duration of the emergency.

(2)

Upon the issuance of a declaration of an emergency or as soon as practicable given the nature of the emergency, the Mayor shall publish a copy of the emergency declaration in the District of Columbia Register and in 2 daily newspapers of general circulation.

Mar. 20, 1992, D.C. Law 9-80, § 2, 39 DCR 675
This section is referenced in § 28-4101 and § 28-4103.
1981 Ed., § 28-4102.
“This act”, referred to in subsec. (b)(1), is D.C. Law 9-80.